vi: Loại album: Trang bỏ túi; Bìa hồ sơ dạng vòng; Sổ lưu bút; Gáy xoắn; Khác
th: ประเภทอัลบั้ม: แบบไส้แฟ้ม; แบบร้อยห่วง; แบบสมุดบันทึกทำมือ; แบบสันกระดูกงู; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 专辑类型: 袖珍页; 活页夹; 剪贴簿; 螺旋装订; 其他
nl: Albumtype: Pocket page; Ringband; Plakboek; Spiraal gebonden; Andere
cs: Typ alba: Na karty; Kroužkově vázané; Výstřižkové album; Spirálově vázané; Jiné
nb: Albumtype: Lommeside; Ringperm; Utklippsbok; Spiralbundet; Annet
da: Albumtype: Lommeside; Ringbind; Scrapbog; Spiralbundet; Andet
pl: Typ albumu: Strona kieszonkowa; Segregator; Album do zdobienia; Na spirali; Inne
de: Albumtyp: Taschenseite; Ringmappe; Scrapbook; Spiralgebunden; Sonstiges
hu: Album típusa: Zseboldal; Gyűrűs; Album; Spirálkötésű; Egyéb
zh-TW: 相冊類型: 袖珍版; 活頁夾; 剪貼簿; 螺旋裝訂; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de álbum: Porta-cartão tipo fichário; Fichário de argolas; Página de recados; Espiral encadernado; Outro
it: Tipo di album: Pagina tascabile; Classificatore ad anelli; Scrapbook; Rilegatura a spirale; Altro
ko: 앨범 유형: 포켓 페이지; 링 바인더; 스크랩북; 스프링 제본; 기타
es: Tipo de álbum: Página de bolsillo; Carpeta de anillas; Álbum de recortes; Encuadernación en espiral; Otros
ja: アルバムの種類: ポケットページ; リングバインダー; スクラップブック; らせん綴じ; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta albuma: S džepićima; Prstenasti uvez; Spomenar; Spiralni uvez; Ostalo
sv: Albumtyp: Ficksida; Ringbunden; Scrapbook; Spiralbunden; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ albumu: Vreckový; Krúžkový zakladač; Zápisník; Špirálovo viazaný; Iné
fr: Type d’album: Page de poche; Reliure à anneaux; Scrapbook; Reliure spirale; Autre
en: Album type: Pocket page; Ring binder; Scrapbook; Spiral bound; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta albuma: Z žepi; Obročasta vezava; Scrapbook; Spiralna vezava; Drugi
el: Τύπος άλμπουμ: Άλμπουμ με θήκες; Κλασέρ με κρίκους; Λεύκωμα; Σπιράλ; Άλλο
tr: Albüm Türü: Cep defteri; Telli defter; Karalama defteri; Spiral bağlı; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de álbum: Página de bolso; Argola para encadernação; Livro de recortes; Encadernação em espiral; Outro
bg-BG: Тип албум: Джобна страница; Папка с халки; Скрапбук; Подвързано със спирала; Други
ru: Тип альбома: Карманная записная книжка; Кольцевой скоросшиватель; Альбом для вырезок; Перекидной блокнот; Другой
lt-LT: Albumo tipas: Kišeninis puslapis; Žiedinis segtuvas; Iškarpų albumas; Surišta spirale; Kita
fi: Albumityyppi: Taskusivu; Rengaskansio; Leikekirja; Spiraalisidottu; Muu
ro-RO: Tip album: Album cu buzunare; Cu inele; Album de însemnări; Cu spirală; Altele